Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 11 Solid Waste Disposal Districts

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, see §§

35-11-101

to

35-11-1106

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 560 to 578.

§ 18-11-101.
Solid waste disposal districts; creation.

Each board of county commissioners may establish by resolution one (1) or more solid waste disposal districts composed of any portion of the county. Areas may be added to or subtracted from an existing district in the same manner.

Not less than sixty (60) days before any resolution pursuant to this section is signed, the board of county commissioners shall submit the proposed boundaries of the district to the county assessor and the department of revenue for review for any conflict, overlap, gap or other boundary issue. The assessor and the department may make written comments thereon to the county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners may dissolve a solid waste disposal district established under subsection (a) of this section in accordance with W.S.

18-3-525

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 126, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 108, § 2; 2022 ch. 92, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a).

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (c).

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to develop an accurate and comprehensive database of the property within each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of property taxes within that governmental entity. Regardless of the date of formation, each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall file a map or legal description designating the current geographical boundaries of the governmental entity with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department’s rules regarding tax districts. Not later than August 1, 2005, the department shall notify each governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section of the entity's most recent filing with the department and whether that filing meets the requirements of this act. If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this act has not met the requirements of this act, or if its most recent filing with the department is no longer accurate, it shall file not later than November 1, 2005 a map or other legal description of its current boundaries in accordance with this act and the department's rules on taxing districts. Thereafter, filings shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Cited

in

Eastern Laramie County Solid Waste v. State Bd. of Equalization, 9 P.3d 268,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 18-11-102.
Powers; management; rates; penalty for violation of rules; removal.

Following the creation of a solid waste disposal district the board of county commissioners shall appoint not less than three (3) nor more than nine (9) residents of the district to constitute the governing board of the district. Appointees shall serve a term of three (3) years and may be reappointed. Terms of office shall be staggered. The governing board may exercise all powers granted to cities and towns by W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xxi) and (xl) and shall adopt rules and regulations in managing the disposal of solid wastes within the district. Violation of a rule or regulation of the governing board requiring disposal of solid wastes in designated sites constitutes a misdemeanor punishable upon conviction by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months or both. A governing board may also enforce its rules and regulations by appropriate legal proceedings and expend and generate revenue relative to the purpose of a solid waste disposal district. The governing board may permit persons or entities not included within the district to utilize the facilities of the district. The governing board may impose fees upon persons or entities included within or outside of the district for the privilege of utilizing the facilities of the district at rates established by the governing board and any revenue generated in this manner shall only be used to operate the district.

The county commissioners may remove any member of the governing board for cause without a public hearing unless the member requests that the action be taken during a public hearing. Vacancies on the governing board shall be filled by the county commissioners for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 126, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1993, ch. 211, § 1; 1995, ch. 19, § 1; 2012, ch. 104, § 1; 2013 ch. 188, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment,

added (b).

Laws 2012, ch. 104 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), deleted “for three (3) additional terms” after “reappointed” at the end of the second sentence.

Cited

in

Eastern Laramie County Solid Waste v. State Bd. of Equalization, 9 P.3d 268,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 18-11-103.
Taxation; limitation.

A solid waste disposal district board may submit to the qualified electors of the district the question of whether or not the district shall annually levy not to exceed three (3) mills on the dollar of assessed valuation of the district to operate the district. The question shall be submitted by the county clerk as ordered by the board of county commissioners at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

The board of county commissioners at the time of making the levy for county purposes shall levy a tax upon the taxable property within a solid waste disposal district to be used solely to operate the district. These monies shall be placed in an account certified by the solid waste disposal district governing board if the mill levy authorization has been approved pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 126, § 1; 1976, ch. 17, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 18-11-104.
Operation of disposal system.

Any requirements or exceptions pertaining to the operation of solid waste disposal systems by cities and towns are also applicable to county solid waste disposal districts.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 126, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-11-105.
Procedures.

The Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] is applicable to all proceedings under W.S.

18-11-101

through

18-11-105

except establishing or changing the boundaries of a solid waste disposal district.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 126, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).